Hawaii statutes.
§576B-708 Recognition and enforcement of
registered Convention support order. (a) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (b), a tribunal of this State shall recognize and enforce a
registered Convention support order.

(b) The following grounds are the only grounds
on which a tribunal of this State may refuse recognition and enforcement of a
registered Convention support order:

(1) Recognition and enforcement of the order is
manifestly incompatible with public policy, including the failure of the issuing
tribunal to observe minimum standards of due process, which include notice and
an opportunity to be heard;

(2) The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction
consistent with section 576B-201;

(3) The order is not enforceable in the issuing country;

(4) The order was obtained by fraud in connection
with a matter of procedure;

(5) A record transmitted in accordance with section
576B‑706 lacks authenticity or integrity;

(6) A proceeding between the same parties and having
the same purpose is pending before a tribunal of this State and that proceeding
was the first to be filed;

(7) The order is incompatible with a more recent
support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose if the
more recent support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement under this
chapter in this State;

(8) Payment, to the extent alleged arrears have been
paid in whole or in part;

(9) In a case in which the respondent neither
appeared nor was represented in the proceeding in the issuing foreign country:

(A) If the law of that country provides for
prior notice of proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the
proceedings and an opportunity to be heard; or

(B) If the law of that country does not
provide for prior notice of the proceedings, the respondent did not have proper
notice of the order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on
fact or law before a tribunal; or

(10) The order was made in violation of section
576B-711.

(c) If a tribunal of this State does not
recognize a Convention support order under subsection (b)(2), (4), or (9):

(1) The tribunal may not dismiss the proceeding
without allowing a reasonable time for a party to request the establishment of
a new Convention support order; and

(2) The support enforcement agency shall take all
appropriate measures to request a child support order for the obligee if the
application for recognition and enforcement was received under section
576B-704. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next